Ohio, session 136, SB375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4731.2211 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4731.2211. (A)(1) An individual whose license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery was revoked under section 4731.22 of the Revised Code may apply to the state medical board for reinstatement of the individual's license. (2) An applicant shall submit to the board a written application on a form prescribed and supplied by the board. The application shall include all the information the board considers necessary to process it. An applicant shall include with the application a fee of six hundred ten dollars, no part of which may be returned. An application is not considered submitted until the board receives the fee. (3) As part of an application, an applicant may request an adjudicatory hearing by the board. (B) The board shall accept an application for reinstatement submitted under this section as follows: (1) Only if submitted after the date that is five years after the date the board issued its order revoking the applicant's license, except that in the case of an applicant whose license was revoked under division (B)(19) or (26) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code, the board shall accept an application submitted on any date that is after the date the board issued its revocation order; (2) In the case of an applicant whose license was revoked under division (B)(6) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code, only if the grounds for revocation under that section involved an act constituting a misdemeanor offense; (3) In the case of an applicant whose license was revoked under division (B)(9) or (10) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code, only if the felony offense that was the grounds for revocation under that section was neither violent nor related to patient care; (4) Even if the board, when revoking an applicant's license, specified under division (L) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code that its action was permanent. (C) To be eligible for reinstatement under this section, an applicant shall demonstrate that all of the following are the case: (1) The applicant participated in one or more community service or professional volunteer activities or programs while the license was revoked. (2) In the case of an applicant whose license was revoked under division (B)(19) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code, the applicant has been treated for the underlying mental or physical illness by a provider recognized in accordance with this chapter. (3) In the case of an applicant whose license was revoked under division (B)(26) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code, the applicant successfully completed a treatment program conducted by a treatment provider approved in accordance with this chapter. (4) The applicant has complied with all terms specified in the board's order revoking the license, including paying any fines or costs imposed by the board. (5) The applicant has successfully completed, for each year the applicant's license has been revoked, at least twenty-five hours of continuing medical education approved by the board or has read an equivalent amount of literature relevant to the applicant's practice specialty as determined by the board. (6) The applicant has undergone an evaluation of the applicant's professional skills and knowledge conducted by an individual or entity trained or otherwise qualified to do so, and a written assessment prepared by the individual or entity conducting the evaluation demonstrates that the applicant has the professional skills and knowledge necessary to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (7) The applicant seeks in good faith to be reinstated to the privilege of practicing medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in this state. (D)(1) The board shall review and consider each application for reinstatement it accepts. Following its review and consideration and, if requested, the adjudicatory hearing described in division (A)(3) of this section, the board may reinstate the applicant's license if it finds, by clear and convincing evidence, both of the following: (a) That the requirements of division (C) of this section have been met; (b) That the applicant is of good moral character, is able to practice with reasonable skill and safety to patients, and should be permitted in the public interest to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (2) The board shall not reinstate a license unless the applicant complies with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code and the board, in its discretion, decides that the results of the criminal records check do not make the applicant ineligible for a license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (3) In the case of an applicant whose license was revoked under division (B)(19) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code, the board shall not reinstate the applicant's license until it finds that the applicant is mentally and physically able to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery with reasonable skill and safety to patients. (E) If the board reinstates a license under this section, then both of the following apply: (1) The board shall impose both of the following terms and conditions on the license holder: (a) Placing the holder on probation for a one-year period under conditions set by the board; (b) Requiring the holder to successfully pass an examination prescribed by the board to determine competency to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (2) The board may impose additional terms and conditions on the license holder, including the following: (a) In the case of a holder described in division (C)(2) of this section, requiring the holder to undergo, on a regular basis, an examination of the holder's mental or physical abilities conducted by an individual or entity trained or otherwise qualified to do so and to demonstrate, based on a written assessment prepared by the individual or entity conducting the examination, that the holder has the mental or physical skills necessary to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (b) Requiring the holder to participate in didactic and clinical coursework or training approved by the board in order to become competent or proficient in areas of practice that the board finds deficient. (F) The board may adopt any rules it considers necessary to implement this section. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code.